Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 21.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8921
Records; available to department.

(1) A veterinary drug distributor transacting commerce in this state shall establish and maintain accurate records of all transactions regarding the receipt and distribution or other disposition of veterinary legend drugs as provided in the Veterinary Drug Distribution Licensing Act.

(2) All records of receipt, distribution, or other disposal of veterinary legend drugs shall be available to the department upon request for inspection, copying, verifying, or other proper use.

(3) If a veterinary drug distributor is authorized by the department to maintain records at a central location, such records shall be made available for authorized inspections within forty-eight hours.

(4) Records kept at a central location that can be retrieved by computer or other electronic means shall be readily available for authorized inspection during the inspection period.

Laws 2008, LB1022, § 21.